Massachusetts, session 194th, S1788.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Paragraph (a) of subdivision (3) of section 7 of chapter 32 of the general laws, as
appearing in the 2022 official edition, is hereby amended in line 182 by adding the following
paragraph:
Lapse of time or failure to file notice of an injury sustained or hazard undergone as
provided for in subdivision (1) of this section or subdivision (1) of section 9, as the case may be,
shall also not be a bar to proceedings under either of such sections if such members or
beneficiaries are filing for benefits under this section or section nine on the basis of an emotional
or psychological injury. In that case, such members or beneficiaries may use the official records
of the employer to establish proof of an injury sustained or hazard undergone. The official record
must show that the member responded to and was directly involved in an incident or incidents.
The incident or incidents need not have occurred within 2 years of the date of application.
of 1